src/det-lex.txt
!*************************************************
!
! DETERMINERS
!
!*************************************************

Multichar_Symbols

+Det		! Determiner

+Dem		! Demonstrative
+Poss		! Possessive
+Q			! Interrogative
+Idf		! Indefinite
+Def		! Definite
+Qty		! Quantifier
+Art		! with article
+1P +2P +3P	! first, sceond or third person

+Fem		!  feminine gender
+Masc		!  masculine gender

+Sg +Pl		! singular or plural in number

+CM +CC +CU	! dialects

LEXICON Root
	Determiners;

LEXICON Determiners

!!!!POSSESSIVE !!!!!

mo+Det+Poss+1P+Sg:mo		#;	! my
mo+Det+Poss+1P+Sg:m'		#;	! my
do+Det+Poss+2P+Sg:do		#;	! your
do+Det+Poss+2P+Sg:d'		#;	! your
ár+Det+Poss+1P+Pl:ár			#;	! our
bhur+Det+Poss+2P+Pl:bhur	#;	! your 

!! this information is on the noun as initial mutation
!! use corresponding +Len / +Ecl to deternine whether sing/pl, masc/fem
!!a+Det+Poss:a			#;	! her/his/their
a+Det+Poss+3P+Pl:a		#;	! their
a+Det+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:a		#;	! her
a+Det+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:a		#;	! his

!!! SEE PRON-LEX á+Det+Poss+3P:á		#;	! it: bhí sé á dhíol (he was selling it)
!!á+Det+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:á		#;	! it: bhí sé á dhíol (he was selling it)
!!á+Det+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:á		#;	! it
!!á+Det+Poss+3P+Pl:á			#;	! it


!!!! INTERROGATIVE !!!!

!! SEE PRON-LEX cad_chuige+Det+Q:tuige				#;	! what
!! SEE PRON-LEX cad+Det+Q:cad				#;	! what
!! SEE PRON-LEX céard+Det+Q:céard			#;	! what
!! SEE PRON-LEX cé+Det+Q:cé				#;	! who
cé+Det+Q+Art+Sg:cén	#;	! which: Det not Pron as requires a noun comp.
!! SEE ADV cá+Det+Q:cá					#;	! where
!!cathain+Det+Q:cathain		#;	! when

!!!! QUANTIFIER !!!! (definite & indefinite amounts)

aon+Det+Qty+Idf:aon		#;	! any
aon+Det+Qty+Idf+hPref:haon	#;	! any
aon+Det+Qty:t-aon		#;	! (the) only
cibé+Det+Qty+Idf:cibé		#;	! whatever
leath+Det+Qty:leath		#;	! half
cupla+Det+Qty:cupla		#;	! few/pair
cúpla+Det+Qty:cúpla		#;	! few/pair
!!! shouldnt mod pron. It intensifies amháin perhaps
!!!ach+Det+Qty:ach			#;	! only "ach sinne amháin"

gach+Det+Qty+Def:gach		#;	! every
gach+Det+Qty+Def+Ecl:ngach	#;	! every
!gach_uile+Det+Qty+Def:chuile	#;	! every & all (=gach uile)
gach+Det+Qty+Def:chuile	#;	! every & all (=gach uile)
!gach_aon+Det+Qty+Def:chaon	#;	! every one   (=gach aon)
gach+Det+Qty+Def:chaon	#;	! every one   (=gach aon)
!gach_aon+CU+Det+Qty+Def:achan	#;	! every one   (=gach aon)
gach+CU+Det+Qty+Def:achan	#;	! every one   (=gach aon)
uile+Det+Qty+Idf:uile		#;	! all
uile+Det+Qty:uilig		#;	! all together (=uile go léir)
iomaí+Det+Qty+Def:iomaí		#;	! many

!!!! DEMONSTRATIVE !!!!

!! the following always come at the end of the noun/pron/adj and cannot 
!! be intermingled with other adjectives 
seo+Det+Dem:seo			#;	! this
seo+CM+Det+Dem:so		#;	! this
sin+Det+Dem:sin			#;	! that
sin+CM+Det+Dem:san		#;	! that
s+Det+Dem:s'			#;	! seo or sin e.g. teach s'againne
siúd+Det+Dem:siúd		#;	! those
úd+Det+Dem:úd			#;	! (those?) yonder
!! contextual tagged as demonstrative for now at least ...
eile+Det+Dem:eile		#;	! other
